District of Columbia statutes.
42-3106

Conviction not required.

A previous conviction of the defendant, or any tenant or owner of the property, shall not be required to demonstrate a drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 7, 45 DCR 7982
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-81, § 3(b), 53 DCR 1050
Nov. 6, 2010, D.C. Law 18-259, § 7(b), 57 DCR 5591
1981 Ed., § 45-3306.
D.C. Law 16-81 substituted “drug or prostitution-related” for “drug-related”.
D.C. Law 18-259 substituted “drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related” for “drug or prostitution-related”.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3101.
For temporary addition of chapter, see notes to § 42-3101.